North Dakota, session 69, SB2157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - AGRICULTURE SAFETY COURSE TO
REDUCE INSURANCE PREMIUMS. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall
study the feasibility and desirability of creating a program that would allow a farmer or rancher to
complete a safety course to receive a discount on insurance relating to the individual's farming or
ranching operation. The study must include the development of a proposed safety course, the feasible
amount of an insurance premium discount, and eligibility requirements for applicants seeking to
participate in the discount program. The study must include input from the insurance commissioner,
agriculture commissioner, the North Dakota state university extension service, and farm, livestock, and
agricultural insurance agencies operating in the state. The legislative management shall report its
findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the
recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2157 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2157.
Senate Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 7 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State